Hawaii statutes.
§459-10 Advertising, contents of. All
advertising by a licensee which contains a price for specified ophthalmic goods
or services shall contain the following information when appropriate:

(1) Whether an advertised price includes single
vision or multifocal lenses;

(2) Whether an advertised price for contact lenses
refers to soft or hard lenses;

(3) Whether an advertised price for ophthalmic goods
includes an eye examination;

(4) Whether an advertised price for ophthalmic goods
includes all dispensing fees; and

(5) Whether an advertised price for eyeglasses
includes both frames and lenses. [L 1917, c 187, §10; RL 1925, §1121; RL 1935,
§1379; RL 1945, §2810; RL 1955, §68-10; HRS §459-10; am L 1985, c 224, §10]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next